Utah statutes.
54-4-12.   Telegraph and telephone -- Connections -- Joint rates -- Division
of costs.
Whenever the commission shall find, after a hearing, that a physical
connection can reasonably be made between the lines of two or more telephone
corporations, or two or more telegraph corporations, whose lines can be made
to form a continuous line of communication by the construction and maintenance
of suitable connections for the transfer of messages or conversations, and
that public convenience and necessity will be subserved thereby, or shall find
that two or more telegraph or telephone corporations have failed to establish
joint rates, tolls or charges for service by or over their said lines and that
joint rates, tolls or charges ought to be established, the commission may, by
its order, require that such connection be made, except where the purpose of
such connection is primarily to secure the transmission of local messages or
conversations between points within the same city or town, and that
conversations be transmitted and messages transferred over such connections
under such rules and regulations as the commission may establish and
prescribe, and that through lines and joint rates, tolls and charges be made
and be used, observed and be in force in the future. If such telephone or
telegraph corporations do not agree upon the division between themselves of
the cost of such physical connection or connections, or upon the division of
the joint rates, tolls or charges established by the commission over such
through lines, the commission shall have authority, after a further hearing,
to establish such division by supplemental order.
